New York, session 2025-2026, S6368.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs h and i of subdivision 1 of section 381 of the 2 executive law, as added by chapter 560 of the laws of 2010, are amended 3 and a new paragraph j is added to read as follows: 4 h. minimum basic training and in-service training requirements for 5 personnel charged with administration and enforcement of the state ener- 6 gy conservation construction code; [and] 7 i. standards and procedures for measuring the rate of compliance with 8 the state energy conservation construction code, and provisions requir- 9 ing that such rate of compliance be measured on an annual basis[.]; 10 j. in the event a complaint is made to a local government or the 11 secretary which results in the issuance of an order in accordance with 12 any regulations promulgated by the powers granted by section three 13 hundred seventy-seven of this article or section three hundred seventy- 14 nine of this article to remedy any condition found to exist in, on, or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04349-04-6 S. 6368--B 2 1 about any building in violation of any regulations promulgated by the 2 powers granted by section three hundred seventy-seven of this article or 3 section three hundred seventy-nine of this article, providing of such 4 order in person or by registered or certified mail to the complainant 5 who initially reported such violation. 6 § 2. Paragraphs i and j of subdivision 1 of section 381 of the execu- 7 tive law, paragraph i as amended and paragraph j as added by section 3 8 of part T of chapter 57 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a new para- 9 graph k is added to read as follows: 10 i. standards and procedures for measuring the rate of compliance with 11 the state energy conservation construction code, and provisions requir- 12 ing that such rate of compliance be measured on an annual basis; [and] 13 j. procedures requiring the documentation of compliance with regu- 14 lations adopted pursuant to section thirteen hundred seventy-seven of 15 the public health law as a condition to issuance of a certificate of 16 occupancy or certificate of compliance following a periodic fire safety 17 and property maintenance inspection for multiple dwellings[.]; 18 k. in the event a complaint is made to a local government or the 19 secretary which results in the issuance of an order in accordance with 20 any regulations promulgated by the powers granted by section three 21 hundred seventy-seven of this article or section three hundred seventy- 22 nine of this article to remedy any condition found to exist in, on, or 23 about any building in violation of any regulations promulgated by the 24 powers granted by section three hundred seventy-seven of this article or 25 section three hundred seventy-nine of this article, providing of such 26 order in person or by registered or certified mail to the complainant 27 who initially reported such violation. 28 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 382 of the executive law, as added by 29 chapter 707 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as follows: 30 1. In addition to and not in limitation of any power otherwise granted 31 by law, every local government and its authorized agents shall have the 32 power to order in writing the remedying of any condition found to exist 33 in, on or about any building in violation of the uniform fire prevention 34 and building code and to issue appearance tickets for violations of the 35 uniform code. A copy of an order served pursuant to this subdivision or 36 any regulations promulgated by the powers granted by section three 37 hundred seventy-seven of this article or section three hundred seventy- 38 nine of this article shall also be provided to a complainant in accord- 39 ance with the rules and regulations established under the powers granted 40 by section three hundred seventy-seven of this article or section three 41 hundred seventy-nine of this article, pursuant to paragraph k of subdi- 42 vision one of section three hundred eighty-one of this article, if such 43 order was issued as a result of a complaint made by an individual. 44 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 45 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that if section 3 of part 46 T of chapter 57 of the laws of 2023 shall not have taken effect on or 47 before such date then section two of this act shall take effect on the 48 same date and in the same manner as such section, takes effect.